Massachusetts, session 194th, S880.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 25A of Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by replacing
Section 25A with the following section:-
SECTION 25A. The division shall disregard income in an amount equivalent to one-
hundred-sixty-five percent (165%) of the federal poverty level, as adjusted annually, in
determining eligibility for the Qualified Medicare Beneficiary, Specified Low-Income Medicare
Beneficiary and Qualified Individual programs, described in 42 U.S.C. §1396(a)(10)(E) and also
known as the Medicare Savings or Medicare Buy-In Programs in the year in which the state plan
amendment is approved;
of 2

The division shall implement a waiting list in any year in which the number of qualified
applicants for the Qualified Individual Program exceeds the annual block grant amount for said
program;
The division shall submit a state plan amendment to implement this section no later than
30 days after the effective date of this section and subsequently promulgate all regulations
necessary to implement said income and asset disregards.
of 2